Utah statutes.
32B-4-413.   Unlawful purchase by interdicted person.

A person may not purchase or possess an alcoholic product if that person is an interdicted person, except:

(1)  under an order of a health care practitioner who is authorized by law to write a prescription; or

(2)  when administered by a hospital or health care practitioner authorized by law to administer the alcoholic product for medicinal purposes.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

